Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 14. University of Wyoming Academic Facilities Challenge Fund

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 1 and Laws 2006, ch. 70, § 1 both added an Article 13 to Title 21, chapter 16. The article added by ch. 70 has been redesignated as Article 14 in Title 21, chapter 16 by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 70, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

§ 21-16-1401.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Challenge account” means the university academic facilities challenge account established under W.S.

21-16-1402

;

“Qualifying contribution” means a transfer of money or other property of a value of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) to the University of Wyoming foundation to be expended exclusively for university academic facilities as approved by the university president and board of trustees. The commitment for a qualifying contribution or the contribution itself shall be made in writing on or after October 1, 2005. The contribution shall be actually received by the University of Wyoming foundation on or before December 31 of the fifth calendar year following the calendar year in which the written commitment was made. Members of a single family may aggregate their individual gifts to meet the minimum dollar threshold required for matching funds. Gifts from nonfamily members in memory of a deceased individual may also be aggregated to meet the minimum dollar threshold required for matching funds.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 70 § 1; 2009, ch. 52, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(ii), substituted “in writing on or after” for “during the period of time beginning,” deleted “and ending December 31, 2009” at the end of the second sentence, and substituted “of the fifth calendar year following the calendar year in which the written commitment was made” for “2011” at the end of the third sentence.

Editor's notes. —

An internal reference in this section to W.S.

21-16-1302

has been changed to W.S.

21-16-1402

to conform to the redesignation of the article added by ch. 70 by the Wyoming legislative service office.

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-16-1402.
University academic facilities challenge account.

The university academic facilities challenge account is created.

The state treasurer shall invest amounts deposited within the account in accordance with law. All investment earnings shall be credited to the general fund. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) or

9-4-207

, other funds within the account shall not lapse or revert until directed by the legislature and shall remain available for distribution as provided in this article.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 70, § 1; 2009, ch. 52, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the last sentence of (b).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2011, ch 53, § 2, provides: “2008 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 48, as amended by 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 159, creating section 339(c)(vi), as amended by 2010 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 39, section 321, authorized one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) in abandoned mine land funds to the college of agriculture at the University of Wyoming to fund an endowment for the reclamation ecology project. 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 159 also created section 339(d) which authorized the department of environmental quality to substitute other university purposes in its grant applications for abandoned mine land funds and authorized the university to substitute its block grant funds where use of abandoned mine land funds was prohibited. The department has submitted applications substituting for the purposes specified in section 339(c)(vi) other university purposes which have been approved for abandoned mine land funds. Pursuant to this approval and process the university has begun substituting block grant funds as authorized and is expected to complete that substitution by June 30, 2013. The legislature ratifies the actions of the department of environmental quality and the university as set forth in this section. The one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) in substituted block grant funds described in this section shall be deposited to the reclamation and restoration challenge account created by W.S. 21-16-1402(a).”

§ 21-16-1403.
Academic facilities challenge matching program; state treasurer to administer program account; matching payments; conditions; annual reports; reversion of appropriations.

The state treasurer shall administer the university academic facilities challenge account established under this article. The following shall apply:

To the extent that funds are available in the challenge account, the state treasurer shall match each qualifying contribution actually received by the University of Wyoming foundation by transferring from the challenge account to the university an amount equal to the amount of the qualifying contribution. Qualifying contributions made directly to the university shall be considered qualifying contributions to the foundation for purposes of this article. The university shall expend both the qualifying contributions and the matching funds solely for the cost of establishing new or renovating existing university academic facilities as approved by the university president and board of trustees for which private fundraising is deemed to be feasible. Authorized expenditures for academic facilities include but are not limited to all expenditures necessary for planning, designing, procuring contractors, construction management and actual construction;

The state treasurer shall make transfers to the university under this section not later than the end of the calendar quarter following the quarter during which the qualifying contribution is received. Matching funds shall only be available for expenditure to the extent cash or cash equivalent contributions are actually received by the University of Wyoming. If a qualifying contribution is made through a series of payments or transfers, no matching funds shall be transferred by the state treasurer until the total value of all payments or transfers actually received toward the contribution totals at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00). Thereafter, matching funds shall be transferred as payments or transfers toward that qualifying contribution are received by the foundation;

The state treasurer shall distribute funds or encumber funds for future distribution in the case of a written commitment, to match a qualifying contribution based on the order in which each qualifying contribution is actually received or in which a written commitment to make a qualifying contribution is received by the foundation. Matching funds shall not be distributed or encumbered in excess of the amount within the challenge account. No matching funds shall be transferred to the university except to match qualifying contributions actually received. The state treasurer shall rescind an encumbrance if the university notifies him that a donor who made a commitment will not make a qualifying contribution that is eligible for matching funds under this section;

For the purpose of calculating the matching amount only, the state treasurer shall use the value of a qualifying contribution based on its fair market value at the time the contribution is received by the university foundation. The university shall provide evidence of fair market value as the state treasurer requires for each qualifying contribution. The state treasurer’s office shall not bear any costs associated with providing evidence;

The University of Wyoming shall on or before October 1 of each calendar year submit a report to the state treasurer from the university foundation regarding the matching program established under this section for the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include a financial summary and a review of the accomplishments resulting from program expenditures. The state treasurer shall distribute the report to the governor and the joint education interim committee.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 52, § 3.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 70, § 1; 2009, ch. 52, §§ 1, 3; 2017 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “Through calendar year 2012” at the beginning of (a)(v); repealed former (a)(vi), pertaining to unexpended funds shall revert to the general fund; and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(ii), inserted the second sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.